ko: 심 게이지 눈금 유형: 단추구멍 간격 표시; 단 깊이 표시; 멀티 스케일(시접 + 단 + 단추구멍); 퀼팅 참조 표시; 시접 표시; 표준 자 눈금 전용; 턱/주름 표시; 기타
sk-SK: Typ stupnice jemnosti švu: Značky na rozostup gombíkových dierok; Značky na hĺbku lemu; Viacúčelová mierka (šev + lem + gombíková dierka); Referenčné značky na prešívanie; Značky prídavkov na švy; Iba štandardné dieliky pravítka; Značky záševkov/záhybov; Iné
it: Tipo di scala di misurazione della cucitura: Segni di spaziatura per asole; Segni di profondità dell'orlo; Multiscala (cucitura + orlo + asola); Segni di riferimento per trapuntatura; Segni di margine di cucitura; Solo graduazioni standard da righello; Segni per pieghe/plissettature; Altro
de: Skalierungstyp der Nahtlehre: Markierungen für Knopflochabstand; Markierungen für Saumtiefe; Mehrfachskala (Naht + Saum + Knopfloch); Quilt-Referenzmarkierungen; Nahtzugaben-Markierungen; Nur Standardlinealeinteilung; Biesen-/Falten-Markierungen; Sonstige
nl: Naadmeter schaaltype: Markeringen voor knoopsgatafstand; Markeringen voor zoomdiepte; Meerdere schalen (naad + zoom + knoopsgat); Referentiemarkeringen voor quilten; Markeringen voor naadtoeslag; Alleen standaard liniaalverdelingen; Markeringen voor plooien; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de escala do medidor de costura: Marcações de espaçamento de casas de botão; Marcações de profundidade da bainha; Multiescala (costura + bainha + casa de botão); Marcações de referência de acolchoamento; Marcações de margem de costura; Apenas graduações de régua padrão; Marcações de pregas/dobras; Outro
bg-BG: Тип скала на шевомер: Маркировки за разстояние на илиците; Маркировки за дълбочина на подгъва; Мултимащаб (шев + подгъв + илик); Референтни маркировки за капитониране; Маркировки за резерва на шева; Само стандартни деления за линия; Маркировки за плисета/набори; Други
da: Sømmålers skalatype: Markeringer til knaphulsafstand; Markeringer til sømdybde; Multiskala (søm, kant og knaphul); Referencemarkeringer til quiltning; Markeringer til sømrum; Kun standardlinealinddelinger; Markeringer til læg/plisseringer; Andet
vi: Loại thang đo độ dày đường may: Vạch chia khoảng cách khuy áo; Vạch chia độ sâu lai áo; Đa tỷ lệ (đường may + lai áo + khuy áo); Vạch tham chiếu may chần; Vạch chia đường may; Chỉ vạch chia thước tiêu chuẩn; Vạch chia nếp gấp/li; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta lestvice merilnika šivov: Oznake za razmik med gumbnicami; Oznake za globino roba; Več meril (šiv + rob + gumbnica); Referenčne oznake za prešitje; Oznake dodatka za šiv; Samo standardna ravnila z delitvijo; Oznake za gube/plise; Drugo
es: Tipo de escala de calibre de costura: Marcas de espaciado de ojales; Marcas de profundidad de dobladillo; Multiescala (costura, dobladillo y ojal); Marcas de referencia para acolchado; Marcas de margen de costura; Solo graduaciones de regla estándar; Marcas de pliegues/pinzas; Otro
ru: Тип шкалы шаблона для припусков: Разметка для петлиц; Разметка глубины подгибки; Многошкальная (шов + подгибка + петля); Контрольная разметка для квилтинга; Разметка припусков на швы; Только стандартная шкала линейки; Разметка для складок/защипов; Другое
el: Τύπος κλίμακας μέτρησης ραφής: Σημάδια απόστασης κουμπότρυπας; Σημάδια βάθους στριφώματος; Πολλαπλή κλίμακα (ραφή + στρίφωμα + κουμπότρυπα); Σημάδια αναφοράς καπιτονέ; Σημάδια περιθωρίου ραφής; Μόνο τυπικές διαβαθμίσεις χάρακα; Σημάδια για πιέτες/τσακίσεις; Άλλο
fi: Saumamitan asteikkotyyppi: Napinläpivälien merkinnät; Päärmeen syvyyden merkinnät; Moniasteikkoinen (sauma + päärme + napinläpi); Tilkkutyön viitemerkinnät; Saumanvaramerkinnät; Vain tavallisen viivaimen asteikko; Laskosten / vekkien merkinnät; Muu
pt-BR: Medidor de costura tipo de escala: Marcações de espaçamento de casas de botão; Marcações de profundidade da bainha; Múltiplas escalas (costura + bainha + casa de botão); Marcações de referência para quilting; Marcações de margem de costura; Apenas graduações padrão de régua; Marcações de pregas/dobras; Outros
th: ประเภทสเกลวัดระยะตะเข็บ: รอยระบุระยะห่างรังดุม; รอยระบุความลึกของชายผ้า; หลายสเกล (ตะเข็บ + ชายผ้า + รังดุม); รอยอ้างอิงการควิลต์; รอยระบุเผื่อเย็บตะเข็บ; เส้นบอกระยะไม้บรรทัดมาตรฐานเท่านั้น; รอยระบุจับจีบ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Siūlių matuoklio skalės tipas: Sagų kilpų atstumų žymos; Atlenkimo gylio žymos; Kelių skalių (siūlė + atlenkimas + sagos kilpa); Daigstymo žymos; Siūlių prielaidų žymos; Tik standartinės liniuotės padalos; Klosčių žymos; Kita
zh-CN: 缝距规刻度类型: 扣眼间距标记; 卷边深度标记; 多刻度（缝份 + 卷边 + 扣眼）; 绗缝参考标记; 缝份标记; 仅标准直尺刻度; 褶裥/折痕标记; 其他
hu: Varrásmérő skálatípusa: Gomblyuktávolság-jelölések; Szegélymásélység-jelölések; Többskálás (varrás + szegély + gomblyuk); Foltvarrási referenciajelölések; Varrásráhagyás-jelölések; Csak szabványos vonalzóbeosztás; Hajtás-/rakásjelölések; Egyéb
ja: シームゲージの目盛りタイプ: ボタンホール間隔の目盛り; 裾の深さの目盛り; マルチスケール (縫い代 + 裾 + ボタンホール); キルティング基準の目盛り; 縫い代の目盛り; 標準定規の目盛りのみ; タック/プリーツの目盛り; その他
pl: Typ skali miarki do szwów: Oznaczenia rozstawu dziurek na guziki; Oznaczenia głębokości podwinięcia; Wieloskalowe (szew + podwinięcie + dziurka na guzik); Oznaczenia referencyjne do pikowania; Oznaczenia zapasu na szew; Tylko standardowa podziałka linijki; Oznaczenia zakładek/plis; Inne
sv: Sömmätare skala-typ: Markeringar för knapphålsavstånd; Markeringar för fålldjup; Flera skalor (söm + fåll + knapphål); Referensmarkeringar för quiltning; Markeringar för sömsmån; Endast standardlinjalmarkeringar; Markeringar för veck/plissering; Övrigt
cs: Typ stupnice měřidla švů: Značení pro rozteč knoflíkových dírek; Značení hloubky lemu; Více měřítek (šev + lem + knoflíková dírka); Referenční značky pro quiltování; Značky pro přídavek na švy; Pouze standardní dělení pravítka; Značky pro záhyby/plisování; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de gradație a lerei de măsurat tivul: Marcaje de distanțare a butonierelor; Marcaje de adâncime a tivului; Scară multiplă (cusătură + tiv + butonieră); Marcaje de referință pentru matlasare; Marcaje pentru rezervele de cusătură; Doar gradații standard de riglă; Marcaje pentru pliuri/cute; Altele
nb: Skalatype for sømmåler: Markeringer for knappehullavstand; Markeringer for falddybde; Flere skalaer (søm, fald og knappehull); Referansemarkeringer for quilting; Markeringer for sømrom; Kun standard linjalinndelinger; Markeringer for legg/folder; Annet
tr: Dikiş ölçer ölçek tipi: İlik aralığı işaretleri; Etek ucu derinlik işaretleri; Çok ölçekli (dikiş + etek ucu + ilik); Kapitone referans işaretleri; Dikiş payı işaretleri; Yalnızca standart cetvel dereceleri; Pili/kıvrım işaretleri; Diğer
zh-TW: 縫份量尺刻度類型: 鈕扣孔間距標記; 摺邊深度標記; 多重刻度 (接縫 + 摺邊 + 鈕扣孔); 拼布參考標記; 縫份標記; 僅標準直尺刻度; 褶飾/打褶標記; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta skale za mjerenje šava: Oznake za razmak rupica za gumbe; Oznake za dubinu poruba; Više mjerila (šav + porub + rupica za gumb); Referentne oznake za prošivanje; Oznake za dodatak za šav; Samo standardne oznake ravnala; Oznake za ušitke/nabore; Ostalo
en: Seam gauge scale type: Buttonhole spacing markings; Hem depth markings; Multi-scale (seam + hem + buttonhole); Quilting reference markings; Seam allowance markings; Standard ruler graduations only; Tuck/pleat markings; Other
fr: Type d’échelle de la jauge de couture: Repères d'espacement de boutonnières; Repères de profondeur d'ourlet; Multi-échelles (couture + ourlet + boutonnière); Repères de référence pour matelassage; Repères de surplus de couture; Graduations de règle standard uniquement; Repères de plis/nervures; Autre